Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3598
Hospital authority; construction; plans; recommendations; effect.

The findings and recommendations, if any, of the appropriate local health planning agency, if any, shall be considered by the board of trustees of the hospital authority in making its determination as to whether or not to proceed with construction of the proposed structure.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 24;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 733, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.97.